Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
448E

ELECTRICIANS
AND PLUMBERS

Section

448E-1 Definitions

448E-2 Board; appointment

448E-3 Repealed

448E-4 Powers and duties of board

448E-5 Minimum requirements

448E-5.5 Examination

448E-6, 7 Repealed

448E-8 Fees; renewals

448E-8.5 Continued competency; license renewals

448E-9 Unlicensed activity

448E-10 Suspension; revocation; fine; denial of
issuance or

renewal of a license

448E-11 Injunction

448E-12 Inspections

448E-13 Exemption of public utility and community
antennae

television company personnel

448E-14 Repealed

Cross References

Sunset evaluations modified, see §§26H-4 and 26H-5.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next